Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.040

Printing and distribution of reports.

Regular and special reports of the geological survey, with proper illustrations and maps, shall be printed as directed by the state geologist. All reports shall be distributed or sold by the department of natural resources as the interests of the state and of science demand. All money obtained by the sale of reports under this section shall be paid into the state treasury.

[ 2006 c 340 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.040. Prior: 1901 c 165 s 4; RRS s 5996.]